Hawaii statutes.
[§11-327] Ballot issue committee;
contributions and expenditures. (a) A ballot issue committee shall
receive contributions or make expenditures only for or against any issue
appearing on the ballot at the next applicable election.

(b) A ballot issue committee is prohibited
from receiving contributions or making expenditures to influence the nomination
or election of a candidate to office.

(c) A ballot issue committee shall return all
surplus funds to the contributors or donate funds to a community service,
educational, youth, recreational, charitable, scientific, or literary
organization within ninety days after the election for which the issue appeared
on the ballot. Surplus funds that are not returned or donated within ninety
days after the election for which the issue appeared on the ballot shall
escheat to the Hawaii election campaign fund.

(d) Every ballot issue committee shall
terminate its registration with the commission by filing a termination report
to be approved as provided in section 11-326. The termination report shall be
filed within ninety days after the election for which the issue appeared on the
ballot. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next